California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(b) The Legislature finds and declares that, because owners of manufactured homes subject to property taxation on rented or leased land do not own the land on which the manufactured home is located and are subject to having the manufactured home removed upon termination of tenancy, “full cash value” for purposes of subdivision (a) does not include any value attributable to the particular site where the manufactured home is located on rented or leased land which would make the sale price of the manufactured home at that location different from its price at some other location on rented or leased land. In determining the “full cash value” of a manufactured home on rented or leased land, the assessor shall take into consideration, among other relevant factors, cost data issued pursuant to Section 401.5 or sales prices listed in recognized value guides for manufactured homes, including, but not limited to, the National Automobile Dealers Association’s Manufactured Housing Appraisal Guide.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 596, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5804.

As used in this part, “taxable value of a manufactured home” means the base year value, or the base year value as adjusted pursuant to Section 5813, plus the value of any new construction as determined pursuant to Section 5825.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 796, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5805.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, manufactured home accessories, as defined in Section 18008.5 of the Health and Safety Code, installed on a rented or leased lot with a manufactured home first sold prior to January 1, 1977, and which were subject to the state vehicle license fee, shall not be subject to local property taxation, unless the manufactured home is also subject to local property taxation pursuant to this part or the accessory is permanently affixed to the land, such as on a foundation. 

(b) In accordance with subdivision (a), manufactured home accessories installed on a rented or leased lot with a manufactured home first sold prior to January 1, 1977, shall be presumed subject to the state vehicle license fee. This presumption may be rebutted by evidence that an accessory was not included in the vehicle license fee base for the manufactured home or was not otherwise subject to the vehicle license fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 796, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Determination of Taxable Values [5810. - 5813.]

5810.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, manufactured homes shall be subject to property taxation in the same manner and to the same extent, and shall be subject to the other provisions of this division in the same manner and to the same extent as any other personal property on the roll as defined in Section 109.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 796, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

5811.

The amount of local property tax on a manufactured home shall be determined by applying the appropriate assessment ratio and tax rate to the taxable value of the manufactured home. The “appropriate tax rate” is the rate determined under Section 93 for the tax rate area in which the manufactured home is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 775, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5812.

(a) The base year value of a manufactured home which is purchased or which changed ownership shall be entered on the roll for the lien date next succeeding the date of the purchase or change in ownership. The value of any new construction shall be entered on the roll for the lien date next succeeding the date of completion of the new construction. The value of new construction in progress on the lien date shall be entered on the roll as of the lien date.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 5802, a manufactured home that has changed ownership or had new construction completed is subject to supplemental assessment as provided in Section 75.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 775, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5813.

For each lien date after the lien date for which the base year value is determined, the taxable value of a manufactured home shall be the lesser of:

(a) Its base year value, compounded annually since the base year by an inflation factor, which shall be the percentage change in the cost of living, as defined in Section 51, provided, that any percentage increase shall not exceed 2 percent of the prior year’s value; or

(b) Its full cash value, as defined in Section 5803, as of the lien date, taking into account reductions in value due to damage, destruction, depreciation, obsolescence, or other factors causing a decline in value; or

(c) If the manufactured home is damaged or destroyed by disaster, misfortune, or calamity, its value determined pursuant to (b) shall be its base year value until the manufactured home is restored, repaired or reconstructed or other provisions of law require establishment of a new base year value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 775, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Change in Ownership [5814. - 5815.]

5814.

(a) For purposes of this part, “change in ownership” and “purchase” shall have the same meanings as provided in Sections 60 to 68, inclusive, to the extent applicable. The operative dates of those sections shall be controlling in the determination of whether a change in ownership or purchase of a manufactured home has occurred.

(b) As used in Sections 60 to 68, inclusive, the term “real property” includes a manufactured home that is subject to tax under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 407, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5815.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a manufactured home otherwise subject to taxation pursuant to this part, which has been removed from its situs and returned to a dealer’s established place of business for purposes of resale, shall not be subject to property taxation during the period it is held in the dealer’s inventory, provided it remains personal property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 796, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. New Construction [5825. - 5825.]

5825.

(a) “Newly constructed” and “new construction” means: 

(1) Any substantial addition to a manufactured home since the last lien date; and 

(2) Any alteration of the manufactured home which constitutes a major rehabilitation thereof or which converts the property to a different use. 

(b) Any rehabilitation, renovation, or modernization which converts a manufactured home to the substantial equivalent of a new manufactured home is a major rehabilitation of that manufactured home. 

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if a manufactured home has been damaged or destroyed by misfortune or calamity, “newly constructed” and “new construction” does not mean any timely reconstruction or replacement of the manufactured home, or portion thereof, where the manufactured home after reconstruction or replacement is substantially equivalent to the manufactured home prior to damage or destruction. Any reconstruction or replacement of a manufactured home, or portion thereof, which is not substantially equivalent to the damaged or destroyed manufactured home, shall be deemed to be new construction and only that portion which exceeds substantially equivalent reconstruction or replacement shall have a new base year value determined pursuant to Section 110.1. 

If a manufactured home, subject to vehicle license and registration fees pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 18114) of Chapter 8 of Part 2 of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code, is destroyed or damaged by misfortune or calamity and is replaced by a substantially equivalent manufactured home subject to local property taxation, the assessor shall determine a base year value for that replacement manufactured home so that the property taxes levied, after adjustment for any applicable exemption, shall be the same amount as the vehicle license and registration fees for the previous manufactured home for the year prior to its destruction or damage. 

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if a manufactured home, subject to vehicle license and registration fees pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 18114) of Chapter 8 of Part 2 of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code is taken by eminent domain, acquired by a public entity, or subject to any governmental action resulting in a judgment of inverse condemnation, “newly constructed” and “new construction” shall not mean any timely replacement of that manufactured home. 

If a manufactured home, subject to vehicle license and registration fees pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 18114) of Chapter 8 of Part 2 of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code, is taken by eminent domain, acquired by a public entity, or subject to any governmental action resulting in a judgment of inverse condemnation, and is replaced by a comparable manufactured home subject to local property taxation, the assessor shall determine a base year value for the replacement manufactured home so that the property taxes levied, after adjustment for any applicable exemption, shall be the same amount as the vehicle license and registration fees for the previous manufactured home in the year that manufactured home was taken, acquired, or adjudged to be inversely condemned. 

(e) The assessor shall determine the new base year value for the portion of any manufactured home which has been newly constructed. The base year value of the remainder of the manufactured home assessed, which did not undergo new construction, shall not be changed. New construction in progress on the lien date shall be appraised at its full value on such date and each lien date thereafter until the date of completion at which time the entire portion of the manufactured home which is newly constructed shall be reappraised at its full value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 796, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Collection of Taxes on Mobilehomes [5830. - 5832.]

5830.

The assessment of any manufactured home shall be entered on the secured roll and shall be subject to all provisions of law applicable to taxes on the secured roll, provided, however:

(a) If the taxes on any manufactured home are not a lien on real property of the owner of the manufactured home pursuant to Section 2188.1, 2189, or 2189.3 and are unpaid when any installment of taxes on the secured roll becomes delinquent, the tax collector may use the procedures applicable to the collection of delinquent taxes on the unsecured roll; and 

(b) If the taxes on any manufactured home which are not a lien on real property of the owner of the manufactured home remain unpaid at the time set for the declaration of default for delinquent taxes, the taxes on the manufactured home, together with any penalties and costs which may have accrued thereon while on the secured roll, shall be transferred to the unsecured roll. 

(c) The taxes on manufactured homes may be paid in two installments as provided in Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 2700) of Part 5, notwithstanding the provisions of Section 2605 and whether or not the board of supervisors has adopted a resolution in accordance with Section 2700.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 796, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5831.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (e) and (f), the assessor shall, upon or prior to completion of the local roll, notify each assessee whose manufactured home’s taxable value has increased of the taxable value of that manufactured home as it shall appear on the completed local roll.

(b) The information given by the assessor to the assessee pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include a notification of hearings by the county board of equalization or assessment appeals board, which shall include the period during which assessment protests will be accepted and the place where they may be filed. The information shall also include an explanation of the stipulation procedure set forth in Section 1607 and the manner in which the assessee may request use of this procedure.

(c) The information shall be furnished by the assessor to the assessee personally or by regular United States mail directed to him or her at the latest address known to the assessor.

(d) Neither the failure of the assessee to receive the information nor the failure of the assessor to so inform the assessee shall in any way affect the validity of any assessment or the validity of any taxes levied pursuant thereto. 

(e) This section shall not apply to annual increases in the valuation of property which reflect the inflation rate, not to exceed 2 percent, pursuant to Section 5813. 

(f) This section does not apply to increases in assessed value caused solely by changes in the assessment ratio provided for in Section 401.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 775, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5832.

(a) (1) Upon application, the county tax collector shall issue a tax clearance certificate or a conditional tax clearance certificate.

(2) Any tax clearance certificate issued shall be used to permit registration of used manufactured homes and for any other purposes that may be prescribed by the Controller. The certificate may indicate that the county tax collector finds that no local property tax is due or is likely to become due, or that any applicable local property taxes have been paid or are to be paid in a manner not requiring the withholding of registration or the transfer of registration.

(3) Any conditional tax clearance certificate issued shall indicate that the county tax collector finds that a tax liability exists, the amount due, and the final date that amount may be paid before a further tax liability is incurred. The certificate shall be in any form that the Controller may prescribe, and shall be executed, issued, and accepted for clearance of registration or permit issuance on the conditions which the Controller may prescribe.

(b) Within five working days of receipt of the written demand for a conditional tax clearance certificate or tax clearance certificate, the county tax collector shall forward the conditional tax clearance certificate or tax clearance certificate, showing no tax liability exists, to the requesting escrow officer. In the event the final due date of the tax clearance certificate or conditional
 tax clearance certificate expires within 30 days of the date of its issuance, an additional conditional tax clearance certificate or tax clearance certificate shall be completed, which has a final due date of at least 30 days beyond the date of issuance. The tax collector shall not charge a fee for the issuance of a certificate unless a previously issued tax clearance certificate or conditional tax clearance certificate expires prior to the date upon which title transfers. The fee for the issuance of a subsequent certificate with respect to that manufactured home shall be an amount equal to the actual costs of preparing and processing that certificate.

(c) If the tax collector fails to comply with the demand within 30 days from the date the demand is mailed, the escrow officer may close the escrow in accordance with the provisions of subdivision
 (m) of Section 18035 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) Notwithstanding any provisions of law requiring the tax collector to issue a tax clearance certificate or conditional tax clearance certificate within a specified period of time, when an escrow information demand is made pursuant to Section 18035 of the Health and Safety Code for a manufactured home that has not been enrolled in the county, the tax collector shall be afforded the number of working days necessary for the assessor to determine the value of the manufactured home and for the auditor to extend tax liability.

(e) The issuance, alteration, forgery, or use of any tax clearance certificate or conditional certificate in a manner contrary to the requirements of the Controller constitutes a misdemeanor.

(f) (1) Prior to January 1, 2021, a person with a conditional transfer of title as described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 18116.1 of the Health and Safety Code may apply to the tax collector to issue either a tax liability or tax clearance certificate. The county tax collector shall issue a tax liability certificate if the person pays the taxes reasonably owed from the date of sale as shown on the conditional transfer of title, without penalties or interest, and not to exceed the amounts attributable one year prior to January 1, 2017.

(2) Upon issuance of a tax clearance or liability certificate, the applicant shall be listed as the owner of record for all local property tax purposes and the home shall not be subject to lien or
 seizure based on any taxes, penalties, or interest as noted on the certificate issued pursuant to paragraph (1). The tax collector shall notify the assessor and other county agencies of the change.

(3) This subdivision does not relieve any owner other than the applicant from tax liability, including penalties and interest, arising from nonpayment prior to the date of sale, or prohibit a county tax collector from collecting delinquent taxes, penalties, or interest due prior to the date of sale, from any owner other than the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 488, Sec. 3.   (AB 173)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Administrative and Miscellaneous Provisions [5840. - 5842.]

5840.

The board shall make such rules and regulations and prepare such forms as are necessary for the administration of, and to carry out the intent and purposes of, this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 285, Sec. 7.   Effective June 30, 1980.   Operative July 1, 1980, by Sec. 23 of Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

5841.

The Department of Housing and Community Development shall furnish to the county assessor of the county in which a manufactured home is sited, on or before the last day of each calendar month, a listing of all new registrations and titles to manufactured homes sited, or to be sited, in that county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 796, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

5842.

The board, the Department of Motor Vehicles, the Department of Housing and Community Development and any county assessor shall exchange or otherwise provide to one another any information relevant to the regulations, titling and taxation of manufactured homes. Such information shall be held confidential by the party receiving the information, except to the extent the information is open to public inspection pursuant to Sections 408, 408.1, and 833 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and Section 1808 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 796, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 14. PROPERTY TAXPAYERS' BILL OF RIGHTS [5900. - 5911.]

5900.

This part shall be known and may be cited as “The Morgan Property Taxpayers’ Bill of Rights.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 387, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5901.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) Taxes are a sensitive point of contact between citizens and their government, and disputes and disagreements often arise as a result of misunderstandings or miscommunications.

(b) The dissemination of information to taxpayers regarding property taxes and the promotion of enhanced understanding regarding the property tax system will improve the relationship between taxpayers and the government.

(c) The proper assessment and collection of property taxes is essential to local government and the health and welfare of the citizens of this state.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature to promote the proper assessment and collection of property taxes throughout this state by advancing, to the extent feasible, uniform practices of property tax appraisal and assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 387, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5902.

This part shall be administered by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 387, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5903.

“Advocate” as used in this part means the “Property Taxpayers’ Advocate” designated pursuant to Section 5904.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 387, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5904.

(a) The board shall designate a “Property Taxpayers’ Advocate.” The advocate shall be responsible for reviewing the adequacy of procedures for both of the following:

(1) The distribution of information regarding property tax assessment matters between and among the board, assessors, and taxpayers.

(2) The prompt resolution of board, assessor, and taxpayer inquiries, and taxpayer complaints and problems.

(b) The advocate shall be designated by, and report directly to, the executive officer of the board. The advocate shall at least annually report to the executive officer on the adequacy of existing procedures, or the need for additional or revised procedures, to accomplish the objectives of this part.

(c) Nothing in this part shall be construed to require the board to reassign property tax program responsibilities within its existing organizational structure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 387, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5905.

In addition to any other duties imposed by this part, the advocate shall periodically review and report on the adequacy of existing procedures, or the need for additional or revised procedures, with respect to the following:

(a) The development and implementation of educational and informational programs on property tax assessment matters for the benefit of the board and its staff, assessors and their staffs, local boards of equalization and assessment appeals boards, and taxpayers.

(b) The development and availability of property tax informational pamphlets and other written materials that explain, in simple and nontechnical language, all of the following matters:

(1) Taxation of real and personal property in California.

(2) Property tax exemptions.

(3) Supplemental assessments.

(4) Escape assessments.

(5) Assessment procedures.

(6) Taxpayer obligations, responsibilities, and rights.

(7) Obligations, responsibilities, and rights of property tax authorities, including, but not limited to, the board and assessors.

(8) Property tax appeal procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 387, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5906.

(a) The advocate shall undertake, to the extent not duplicative of existing programs, periodic review of property tax statements and other property tax forms prescribed by the board to determine both of the following:

(1) Whether the forms and their instructions promote or discourage taxpayer compliance.

(2) Whether the forms or questions therein are necessary and germane to the assessment function.

(b) The advocate shall undertake the review of taxpayer complaints and identify areas of recurrent conflict between taxpayers and assessment officers. This review shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The adequacy and timeliness of board and assessor responses to taxpayers’ written complaints and requests for information.

(2) The adequacy and timeliness of corrections of the assessment roll, cancellations of taxes, or issuances of refunds after taxpayers have provided legitimate and adequate information demonstrating the propriety of the corrections, cancellations, or refunds, including, but not limited to, the filing of documents required by law to claim these corrections, cancellations, or refunds.

(3) The timeliness, fairness, and accessibility of hearings and decisions by the board, county boards of equalization, or assessment appeals boards where taxpayers have filed timely applications for assessment appeal.

(4) The application of penalties and interest to property tax assessments or property tax bills where the penalty or interest is a direct result of the assessor’s failure to request specified information or a particular method of reporting information, or where the penalty or interest is a direct result of the taxpayer’s good faith reliance on written advice provided by the assessor or the board.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to modify any other provision of law or the California Code of Regulations regarding requirements or limitations with respect to the correction of the assessment roll, the cancellation of taxes, the issuance of refunds, or the imposition of penalties or interest.

(d) The board shall annually conduct a public hearing, soliciting the input of assessors, other local agency representatives, and taxpayers, to address the advocate’s annual report pursuant to Section 5904, and to identify means to correct any problems identified in that report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 387, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5907.

No state or local officer or employees responsible for the appraisal or assessment of property shall be evaluated based solely upon the dollar value of assessments enrolled or property taxes collected. However, nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent an official or employee from being evaluated based upon the propriety and application of the methodology used in arriving at a value determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 387, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5908.

Upon request of a county assessor or assessors, the advocate, in conjunction with any other programs of the board, shall assist assessors in their efforts to provide education and instruction to their staffs and local taxpayers for purposes of promoting taxpayer understanding and compliance with the property tax laws, and, to the extent feasible, statewide uniformity in the application of property tax laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 387, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5909.

(a) County assessors may respond to a taxpayer’s written request for a written ruling as to property tax consequences of an actual or planned particular transaction, or as to the property taxes liability of a specified property. For purposes of statewide uniformity, county assessors may consult with board staff prior to issuing a ruling under this subdivision. Any ruling issued under this subdivision shall notify the taxpayer that the ruling represents the county’s current interpretation of applicable law and does not bind the county, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) Where a taxpayer’s failure to timely report information or pay amounts of tax directly results from the taxpayer’s reasonable reliance on the county assessor’s written ruling under subdivision (a), the taxpayer shall be relieved of any penalties, or interest assessed or accrued, with respect to property taxes not timely paid as a direct result of the taxpayer’s reasonable reliance. A taxpayer’s failure to timely report property values or to make a timely payment of property taxes shall be considered to directly result from the taxpayer’s reasonable reliance on a written ruling from the assessor under subdivision (a) only if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The taxpayer has requested in writing that the assessor advise as to the property tax consequences of a particular transaction or as to the property taxes with respect to a particular property, and fully described all relevant facts and circumstances pertaining to that transaction or property.

(2) The assessor has responded in writing and specifically stated the property tax consequences of the transaction or the property taxes with respect to the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 387, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5910.

The advocate shall, on or before January 1, 1994, make specific recommendations to the board with respect to standardizing interest rates applicable to escape assessments and refunds of property taxes, and statutes of limitations, so as to place property taxpayers on an equal basis with taxing authorities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 387, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5911.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this part to ensure that:

(a) Taxpayers are provided fair and understandable explanations of their rights and duties with respect to property taxation, prompt resolution of legitimate questions and appeals regarding their property taxes, and prompt corrections when errors have occurred in property tax assessments.

(b) The board designate a taxpayer’s advocate position independent of, but not duplicative of, the board’s existing property tax programs, to be specifically responsible for reviewing property tax matters from the viewpoint of the taxpayer, and to review and report on, and to recommend to the board’s executive officer any necessary changes with respect to, property tax matters as described in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 387, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 2. OTHER TAXES [6001. - 61050.]



PART 1. SALES AND USE TAXES [6001. - 7176.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [6001. - 6024.]

6001.

This part is known and may be cited as the “Sales and Use Tax Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6002.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions given in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6003.

“Sales tax” means the tax imposed by Chapter 2 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6004.

“Use tax” means the tax imposed by Chapter 3 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6005.

“Person” includes any individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company, association, social club, fraternal organization, corporation, estate, trust, business trust, receiver, assignee for the benefit of creditors, trustee, trustee in bankruptcy, syndicate, the United States, this state, any county, city and county, municipality, district, or other political subdivision of the state, or any other group or combination acting as a unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 46.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6006.

“Sale” means and includes:

(a) Any transfer of title or possession, exchange, or barter, conditional or otherwise, in any manner or by any means whatsoever, of tangible personal property for a consideration. “Transfer of possession” includes only transactions found by the board to be in lieu of a transfer of title, exchange, or barter.

(b) The producing, fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting of tangible personal property for a consideration for consumers who furnish either directly or
 indirectly the materials used in the producing, fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting.

(c) The furnishing and distributing of tangible personal property for a consideration by social clubs and fraternal organizations to their members or others. 

(d) The furnishing, preparing, or serving for a consideration of food, meals, or drinks.

(e) A transaction whereby the possession of property is transferred but the seller retains the title as security for the payment of the price.

(f) A transfer for a consideration of the title or possession of tangible personal property which has been produced, fabricated, or printed to the special order of the customer, or of any publication.

(g) Any
 lease of tangible personal property in any manner or by any means whatsoever, for a consideration, except a lease of:

(1) Motion pictures or animated motion pictures, including television, films, and tapes.

(2) Linen supplies and similar articles when an essential part of the lease agreement is the furnishing of the recurring service of laundering or cleaning the articles.

(3) Household furnishings with a lease of the living quarters in which they are to be used.

(4) Mobile transportation equipment for use in transportation of persons or property as defined in Section 6023.

(5) Tangible personal property leased in substantially the same form as acquired by the lessor or leased in
 substantially the same form as acquired by a transferor, as to which the lessor or transferor has paid sales tax reimbursement or has paid use tax measured by the purchase price of the property. For purposes of this paragraph, “transferor” shall mean the following:

(A) A person from whom the lessor acquired the property in a transaction described in subdivision (b) of Section 6006.5.

(B) A decedent from whom the lessor acquired the property by will or the laws of succession.

(6) A mobilehome, as defined in Sections 18008 and 18211 of the Health and Safety Code, other than a mobilehome originally sold new prior to July 1, 1980, and not subject to local property taxation.

(7) Paragraphs (1) and (5) and Section 6094.1 shall not apply to rentals or leases
 of video cassettes, video tapes, and video discs for private use under which the lessee or renter does not obtain or acquire the right to license, broadcast, exhibit, or reproduce the video cassette, video tape, or video disc.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 915, Sec. 3.   Effective September 21, 1987.   Superseded January 1, 2027; see amendment by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

6006.

“Sale” means and includes:

(a) Any transfer of title or possession, exchange, or barter, conditional or otherwise, in any manner or by any means whatsoever, of tangible personal property for a consideration. “Transfer of possession” includes only transactions found by the department to be in lieu of a transfer of title, exchange, or barter.

(b) The producing, fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting of tangible personal property for a consideration for consumers who furnish either directly or indirectly the materials used in the producing, fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting.

(c) The furnishing and distributing of tangible personal property for a consideration by social clubs and fraternal organizations to their members or others.

(d) The furnishing, preparing, or serving for a consideration of food, meals, or drinks.

(e) A
 transaction whereby the possession of property is transferred but the seller retains the title as security for the payment of the price.

(f) A transfer for a consideration of the title or possession of tangible personal property which has been produced, fabricated, or printed to the special order of the customer, or of any publication.

(g) Any lease of tangible personal property in any manner or by any means whatsoever, for a consideration, except a lease of:

(1) Motion pictures or animated motion pictures, including television, films, and tapes.

(2) Linen supplies and similar articles when an essential part of the lease agreement is the furnishing of the recurring service of laundering or cleaning the articles.

(3) Household furnishings with a lease of the living quarters in which they are to be used.

(4) Mobile transportation equipment for use in transportation of persons or property as defined in Section 6023.

(5) Tangible personal property leased in substantially the same form as acquired by the lessor or leased in substantially the same form as acquired by a transferor, as to which the lessor or transferor has paid sales tax reimbursement or has paid use tax measured by the purchase price of the property. For purposes of this paragraph, “transferor” shall mean the following:

(A) A person from whom the lessor acquired the property in a transaction described in subdivision (b) of Section 6006.5.

(B) A decedent from whom the lessor acquired the property by will or the laws of succession.

(6) A mobilehome, as defined in Sections 18008 and 18211 of the Health and Safety Code, other than a mobilehome originally sold new prior to July 1, 1980, and not subject to local property taxation.

(7) Paragraphs (1) and (5) and Section 6094.1 shall not apply to rentals or leases of video cassettes, video tapes, and video discs for private use under which the lessee or renter does not obtain or acquire the right to license, broadcast, exhibit, or reproduce the video cassette, video tape, or video disc.

(h) Any transfer of title or possession, exchange, or barter, conditional or otherwise, in any manner or by any means, of a
 digital product transferred on tangible storage media for a consideration.

(i) Any permanent or temporary transfer of the right, in any manner or by any means whatsoever, to open, view, access, download, copy, update, possess, store, manipulate, or otherwise use a digital product transferred electronically or accessed remotely for a consideration, beginning January 1, 2027.

(j) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 2.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6006.1.

The granting of possession of tangible personal property by a lessor to a lessee, or to another person at the direction of the lessee, is a continuing sale in this state by the lessor for the duration of the lease as respects any period of time the leased property is situated in this state, irrespective of the time or place of delivery of the property to the lessee or such other person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6006.3.

“Lease” includes rental, hire and license. “Lease” does not include a use of tangible personal property for a period of less than one day for a charge of less than twenty dollars ($20) when the privilege to use the property is restricted to use thereof on the premises or at a business location of the grantor of the privilege. Where a contract designated as a lease binds the lessee for a fixed term and the lessee is to obtain title at the end of the term upon the completion of the required payment or has the option at that time to purchase the property for a nominal amount, the contract shall be regarded as a sale under a
 security agreement from its inception and not as a lease. In the case of a contract designated as a lease with any state or local governmental body, or any agency or instrumentality thereof, the lessee shall be treated as bound for a fixed term notwithstanding any right of the lessee to terminate the contract in the event that sufficient funds are not appropriated to pay amounts due under the contract.
